District of Columbia statutes.
22-1809

Prosecutions.

All prosecutions for violations of § 22-1321 or any of the provisions of any of the laws or ordinances provided for by this act shall be conducted in the name of and for the benefit of the District of Columbia, and in the same manner as provided by law for the prosecution of offenses against the laws and ordinances of the said District. Any person convicted of any violation of § 22-1321 or any of the provisions of this act, and who shall fail to pay the fine or penalty imposed, or to give security where the same is required, shall be committed to the Workhouse of the District of Columbia for a term not exceeding 6 months for each and every offense. The second sentence of this section shall not apply with respect to any violation of § 22-1312(b).

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 18
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 93, 98, ch. 159, §§ 202(a)(2), 211(b)
redesignated § 211a, May 26, 2011, D.C. Law 18-375, § 3(b), 58 DCR 731
The term, “this act,” referred to twice in this section, refers to the Act of July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 303(b) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 303(b) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
1973 Ed., § 22-109.
1981 Ed., § 22-109.
Uniform Narcotic Drug Act, see § 48-901.02 et seq.
Conduct of prosecutions, see § 23-101.
Alcoholic Beverage Control Act, see § 25-101 et seq.
Adulteration of food and drugs, see § 48-101 et seq.